apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON N_PEREH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PEREH-SG	;
	N_PEREH-PL	;
LEXICON N_PEREH-SG
:%{front%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-SG	;

LEXICON N_PEREH-PL
:%{front%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-PL	;

LEXICON N_HUIKEH !!= @CODE@ huikeh:huikkeh
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_HUIKEH-SG	;
	N_HUIKEH-PL	;
LEXICON N_HUIKEH-SG
:%{back%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-SG	;

LEXICON N_HUIKEH-PL
:%{back%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-PL	;

LEXICON N_LIIKEH !!= @CODE@ liikeh:liikkeh
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_LIIKEH-SG	;
	N_LIIKEH-PL	;
LEXICON N_LIIKEH-SG
:%{front%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-SG	;

LEXICON N_LIIKEH-PL
:%{front%}	NMN_HUIKEH/LIIKEH-PL	;

LEXICON N_PENGER !!= @CODE@ penger:penger
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PENGER-SG	;
	N_PENGER-PL	;
LEXICON N_PENGER-SG
:	NMN_PENGER-SG	;

LEXICON N_PENGER-PL
:	NMN_PENGER-PL	;

LEXICON N_ARTELI !!= @CODE@ arteli:arteli
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_ARTELI-SG ;
	N_ARTELI-PL ;
LEXICON N_ARTELI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-SG ;
LEXICON N_ARTELI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS !!= @CODE@ puhtahus:puhtahu
!! Harmony: Back
!! Gradation NA
:%{back%}%>s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PUHTAHUS-SG ;
        N_PUHTAHUS-PL ;
LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-SG ;
LEXICON N_PUHTAHUS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-PL ;

LEXICON N_VÄHYS !!= @CODE@ vähys:vähy
!! Harmony: Back
!! Gradation NA
:%{back%}%>s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_VÄHYS-SG ;
        N_VÄHYS-PL ;
LEXICON N_VÄHYS-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-SG ;
LEXICON N_VÄHYS-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS-PL ;


LEXICON N_AIGOMUS
 N_ALUS ;

LEXICON N_ALUS !!= @CODE@ alus:aluks
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
:%^KS2S ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_ALUS-SG ;
 N_ALUS-PL ;

LEXICON N_ALUS-SG !!= @CODE@ alus:aluks
:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-SG ;

LEXICON N_ALUS-PL !!= @CODE@ alus:aluks
:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON N_ILVES !!= @CODE@ ilves:ilveks
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
:%^KS2S ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_ILVES-SG ;
 N_ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON N_ILVES-SG !!= @CODE@ ilves:ilveks
:%{front%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-SG ;

LEXICON N_ILVES-PL !!= @CODE@ ilves:ilveks
:%{front%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON N_MIES !!= @CODE@ mies:mie
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_MIES-SG ;
 N_MIES-PL ;

LEXICON N_MIES-SG !!= @CODE@ mies:mie
:%{front%} NMN_MIES-SG ;

LEXICON N_MIES-PL !!= @CODE@ mies:mie
:%{front%} NMN_MIES-PL ;

LEXICON N_KUURNIS !!= @CODE@ kuurnis:kuurne
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:%>is ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_KUURNIS-SG ;
        N_KUURNIS-PL ;
LEXICON N_KUURNIS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KUURNIS-SG ;
LEXICON N_KUURNIS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KUURNIS-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ !!= @CODE@ suališ:suali
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:š ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUALIŠ-SG ;
 N_SUALIŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ-SG !!= @CODE@ suališ:suali
:%{back%} NMN_SUALIŠ-SG ;

LEXICON N_SUALIŠ-PL !!= @CODE@ suališ:suali
:%{back%} NMN_SUALIŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_OLUT !!= @CODE@ olut:olu
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
:t ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_OLUT-SG ;
 N_OLUT-PL ;

LEXICON N_OLUT-SG
:%{back%} NMN_OLUT-SG ;

LEXICON N_OLUT-PL
:%{back%} NMN_OLUT-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT !!= @CODE@ kevät:kevä
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
:t ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KEVÄT-SG ;
 N_KEVÄT-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KEVÄT-SG ;

LEXICON N_KEVÄT-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KEVÄT-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUHAT !!= @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_TUHAT-SG ;
 N_TUHAT-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUHAT-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUHAT-SG ;

LEXICON N_TUHAT-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUHAT-PL ;

LEXICON N_ARMAS !!= @CODE@ armas:arma
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_ARMAS-SG        ;
    N_ARMAS-PL        ;
LEXICON N_ARMAS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-SG	;
LEXICON N_ARMAS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-PL	;

LEXICON N_EVAES !!= @CODE@ eväs:evä
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_EVAES-SG        ;
    N_EVAES-PL        ;
LEXICON N_EVAES-SG
:%{front%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-SG	;
LEXICON N_EVAES-PL
:%{front%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES-PL	;

LEXICON N_VARVAS !!= @CODE@ varvas:varba
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:%^WGStem%>s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_VARVAS-SG        ;
    N_VARVAS-PL        ;
LEXICON N_VARVAS-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VARVAS-SG	;
LEXICON N_VARVAS-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VARVAS-PL	;


LEXICON N_PAREMBI !!= @CODE@ parembi:paremb
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_PAREMBI-SG	  ;
 N_PAREMBI-PL	  ;

LEXICON N_PAREMBI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_PAREMBI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PESSYH !!= @CODE@ pessyh:pessy
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_PESSYH-SG ;
 N_PESSYH-PL ;
LEXICON N_PESSYH-SG
:%{front%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-SG ;
LEXICON N_PESSYH-PL
:%{front%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-PL ;

LEXICON N_TULLUH !!= @CODE@ tulluh
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_TULLUH-SG ;
 N_TULLUH-PL ;
LEXICON N_TULLUH-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-SG ;
LEXICON N_TULLUH-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH-PL ;



LEXICON N_BEMMEL !!= @CODE@ bemmel:bembel
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
:%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_BEMMEL-SG        ;
    N_BEMMEL-PL        ;
LEXICON N_BEMMEL-SG
:%{front%} NMN_BEMMEL-SG	;
LEXICON N_BEMMEL-PL
:%{front%} NMN_BEMMEL-PL	;

LEXICON N_VIDEL !!= @CODE@ videl:videl
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
    N_VIDEL-SG        ;
    N_VIDEL-PL        ;
LEXICON N_VIDEL-SG
:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL-SG	;
LEXICON N_VIDEL-PL
:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL-PL	;



LEXICON N_SUURIM !!= @CODE@ suurim:suurim
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SUURIM-SG  ;
        N_SUURIM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SUURIM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SUURIM-SG ;

LEXICON N_SUURIM-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SUURIM-PL ;

LEXICON N_TUATINDAM !!= @CODE@ tuatindam:tuatindam
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_TUATINDAM-SG  ;
        N_TUATINDAM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TUATINDAM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUATINDAM-SG ;

LEXICON N_TUATINDAM-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUATINDAM-PL ;


LEXICON N_TUATANDIM !!= @CODE@ tuatandim:tuatandim
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_TUATANDIM-SG  ;
        N_TUATANDIM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TUATANDIM-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TUATANDIM-SG ;

LEXICON N_TUATANDIM-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TUATANDIM-PL ;

LEXICON N_TYTÄRDIM !!= @CODE@ tytärdim:tytärdim
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_TYTÄRDIM-SG  ;
        N_TYTÄRDIM-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TYTÄRDIM-SG
:%{front%} NMN_TYTÄRDIM-SG ;

LEXICON N_TYTÄRDIM-PL
:%{front%} NMN_TYTÄRDIM-PL ;

LEXICON N_SIEMEN !!= @CODE@ siemen:siemen
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SIEMEN-SG  ;
        N_SIEMEN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SIEMEN-SG
        N_PAIMEN-SG  ;
LEXICON N_SIEMEN-PL
        N_PAIMEN-PL  ;


LEXICON N_PAIMEN !!= @CODE@ paimen:paimen
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_PAIMEN-SG  ;
        N_PAIMEN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_PAIMEN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PIENAR-SG ;

LEXICON N_PAIMEN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PIENAR-PL ;


LEXICON N_SALBOIN !!= @CODE@ salboin:salboi
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
:n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SALBOIN-SG  ;
        N_SALBOIN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_SALBOIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SALBOIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_SALBOIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SALBOIN-PL ;


LEXICON N_ENIN !!= @CODE@ enin:eni
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
:n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_ENIN-SG  ;
        N_ENIN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_ENIN-SG
:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_ENIN-PL
:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_UDAR !!= @CODE@ udar:udar
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_UDAR-SG  ;
        N_UDAR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_UDAR-SG
:%{back%} NMN_UDAR-SG ;

LEXICON N_UDAR-PL
:%{back%} NMN_UDAR-PL ;

LEXICON nouns
akansizär%<n%>:akan#sizär N_PENGER  "vaimon sisar" ;
einehet%<n%>:eineh N_PEREH-PL  "ruokatavara" ;
evähät%<n%>:evä N_ARMAS-PL  "eväät" ;
galdari%<n%>:galdaria N_ARTELI  "parveke" ;
heinänsiemenet%<n%>:heinän#siemenet N_SIEMEN-PL  "heinänsiemen" ;
hullavunnuh%<n%>:hullavunnu N_PESSYH  "halvaantunut" ;
huuhmar%<n%>:huuhmar N_PENGER  "huhmar" ;
hyvämieližys%<n%>:hyvä#mieližy N_VÄHYS  "ystävällisyys" ;
häräkeh%<n%>:häräkkeh N_LIIKEH  "oksikas puu" ;
hävinnyh%<n%>:hävinny N_PESSYH  "hävinnyt" ;
höyhenet%<n%>:höyhen N_SIEMEN-PL  "höyhenet" ;
innottomus%<n%>:innottomu N_PUHTAHUS  "innottomuus" ;
iäven%<n%>:iäven N_SIEMEN  "avanto" ;
juurut%<n%>:juurut N_OLUT  "pikku juuri" ;
jygevys%<n%>:jygevy N_VÄHYS  "raskaus" ;
jyrineh%<n%>:jyrineh N_PEREH  "jyrinä" ;
kameramies%<n%>:kamera#mie N_MIES  "kameramies" ;
kangas%<n%>:kanga N_ARMAS  "kangas" ;
kangassammal%<n%>:kangas#sammal N_BEMMEL  "kangassammal" ;
karti%<n%>:karti N_ARTELI  "pelikortti" ;
kerakeh%<n%>:kerakkeh N_HUIKEH  "konsonantti" ;
kevät%<n%>:kevä N_KEVÄT  "kevät" ;
kierdomečästys%<n%>:kierdo#mečästyks N_ILVES  "ajometsästys" ;
kiistit%<n%>:kiisti N_ARTELI-PL  "tupsut" ;
kiitos%<n%>:kiitos N_ALUS  "kiitoks" ;
kirjain%<n%>:kirjai N_SALBOIN  "kirjain" ;
korokeh%<n%>:korokkeh N_HUIKEH  "koroke" ;
kudžoimätäs%<n%>:kudžoi#mättä N_VARVAS  "muurahaiskeko" ;
kyynel%<n%>:kyynel N_BEMMEL  "kyynel" ;
käzyt%<n%>:käzy N_OLUT  "käsi" ;
köyhen%<n%>:köyhen N_SIEMEN  "hilse" ;
liideh%<n%>:liideh N_PEREH  "kaakko" ;
liiteh%<n%>:liitteh N_LIIKEH  "liite" ;
livvi%<n%>:livvi N_ARTELI-SG  "livvi" ;
lounat%<n%>:louna N_KEVÄT  "lounas" ;
lyyhtes%<n%>:lyyhte N_ARMAS  "lyhde" ;
lähys%<n%>:lähy N_PUHTAHUS  "läheisyys" ;
manner%<n%>:manner N_PENGER  "manner" ;
merimies%<n%>:meri#mie N_MIES  "merimies" ;
muamindam%<n%>:muamindam N_TUATINDAM  "äitipuoli" ;
nuorižojoukkoviestimet%<n%>:nuorižo#joukko#viesti N_SALBOIN-PL  "nuorisojoukkoviestimet" ;
orjus%<n%>:orju N_PUHTAHUS-SG  "orjuus" ;
palannuh%<n%>:palannu N_PESSYH  "palanut" ;
palčokset%<n%>:palčoks N_ALUS-PL  "rohtimet" ;
penger%<n%>:penger N_PENGER  "penger" ;
poijindam%<n%>:poijindama N_TUATINDAM  "poikapuoli" ;
pordahat%<n%>:porda N_VARVAS-PL  "portaat" ;
porras%<n%>:porda N_VARVAS  "porras" ;
regyt%<n%>:regy N_OLUT-PL  "kelkka" ;
ruis%<n%>:ruge N_KUURNIS  "ruis" ;
ryöppävys%<n%>:ryöppävyks N_ILVES  "kulaus" ;
sablahat%<n%>:sablahat N_ARMAS-PL  "sapilaat" ;
sarvut%<n%>:sarvut N_OLUT  "sarvi" ;
sportumies%<n%>:sportumie N_MIES  "urheilija" ;
suališ%<n%>:suale N_SUALIŠ  "saalis {sualehen, sualištu, sualehii}" ;
suališ%<n%>:suale N_SUALIŠ  "saalis (sualehen, sualištu, sualehii)" ;
suališ%<n%>+Err/Sub:suoliš N_SUALIŠ  "tienesti" ;
suares%<n%>:suares N_AIGOMUS  "suosaari" ;
suojukset%<n%>:suojuks N_ALUS-PL  "rakennukset" ;
suurim%<n%>:suurima N_SUURIM  "suurimo" ;
syväin%<n%>:syväi N_SALBOIN  "sydän" ;
säes%<n%>:säke N_VARVAS  "säde (yougi)" ;
taimen%<n%>:taimen N_SIEMEN  "taimi" ;
taimenet%<n%>:taimenet N_SIEMEN-PL  "taimet" ;
taivas%<n%>:taiva N_ARMAS  "taivas" ;
tiedohuot%<n%>:tiedohuot N_OLUT-PL  "noituus" ;
tiedohus%<n%>:tiedohuks N_ALUS  "tieto" ;
tuatindam%<n%>:tuatindam N_TUATINDAM  "isäpuoli" ;
turizmutuoteh%<n%>:turizmu#tuotteh N_HUIKEH  "matkailutuote" ;
tytärdim%<n%>:tytärdim N_TUATANDIM  "tytärpuoli" ;
udar%<n%>:udar N_UDAR  "utare" ;
vahnin%<n%>:vahnin N_SUURIM  "vanhin" ;
vanhembat%<n%>:vanhemb N_PAREMBI-PL  "vanhemmat" ;
vellekset%<n%>:velleks N_ALUS-PL  "veljekset" ;
verikyynäl%<n%>:veri#kyynäl N_BEMMEL  "katkera kyynel" ;
viivotin%<n%>:viivoti N_SALBOIN  "viivotin" ;
vuozituhat%<n%>:vuozi#tuha N_TUHAT  "vuosituhat" ;
yhtenjyttymys%<n%>:yhten#jyttymy N_PUHTAHUS  "yhdenmukaisuus" ;
čihineh%<n%>:čihineh N_PEREH  "sihinä" ;
šampuni%<n%>:šampuni N_ARTELI  "shampoo" ;
štanit%<n%>:štani N_ARTELI-PL  "housut" ;
LEXICON N_NEWWORDS
lypsys:lypsyks N_ILVES ;
monimieližys:moni#mieližy N_VÄHYS ;
mustoiteh:mustoitteh N_LIIKEH	"" ;
poštuozuteh:poštu#ozuta N_HUIKEH ;
rippumattomus:rippumattomu N_PUHTAHUS ;
segasulateh:segasulatteh N_LIIKEH	"" ;
šouferi:šouferia N_ARTELI ;
syvändeh:syvändeh N_PEREH ;
syöndyannos:syöndy#annoks N_ALUS ;
tylgevys:tylgevy N_VÄHYS ;
vidžerdys:vidžerdyks N_ILVES ;
